Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.160

Delegation to nurse.

A licensed midwife may delegate to a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse selected acts, tasks, or procedures that constitute the practice of midwifery but do not exceed the education of the nurse.

[ 2014 c 187 s 4.]